District of Columbia statutes.
47-1376

Validity of taxes and sale presumed unless attacked in answer.

In an action to foreclose the right of redemption, the plaintiff shall not be required to plead or prove the various steps, procedure, and notices for the assessment and imposition of the taxes for which the real property was sold or the proceedings taken by the Mayor to sell the real property. The validity of the procedure is conclusively presumed unless a defendant in the proceeding shall, by answer, plead as an affirmative defense, the invalidity of the taxes, the invalidity of the proceedings to sell, or the invalidity of the sale.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).